Utah statutes.
15-2-4.   Payment for personal services.

When a contract for the personal services of a minor has been made with him alone, and those services are afterward performed, payment made therefor to such minor in accordance with the terms of the contract is a full satisfaction for those services, and the parent or guardian cannot recover therefor a second time.



No Change Since 1953

